Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,140
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; relevant information; disclosure prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any insurer, any person acting on behalf of the insurer, or an authorized agency to make any relevant information received or released under sections 44-3,134 to 44-3,142 a public record except in a criminal or civil proceeding.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 7.